District of Columbia statutes.
44-804

Confidentiality of identity in publications.

Any publication by any medical utilization review committee, peer review committee, medical staff committee or tissue review committee shall keep confidential the identity of any patient whose condition, care or treatment was a part thereof.

Sept. 29, 1978, D.C. Law 2-112, § 5, 25 DCR 1471
1981 Ed., § 32-504.
1973 Ed., § 32-364.